Utah statutes.
72-4-134.   State highways -- SR-282, SR-284 to SR-287, SR-289, and SR-290.

State highways include:

(1)  SR-282.  At University of Utah.

(a)  From 500 South Street north on Campus Center Drive to South Campus Drive.

(b)  From University Street and 400 South Street easterly and northeasterly on South Campus Drive to Wasatch Drive.

(c)  From Foothill Boulevard Route 186 northerly on Wasatch Drive to South Medical Drive.

(d)  From Wasatch Drive northerly on South Medical Drive and West Medical Drive to North Campus Drive; then south and southwest to University Street and 100 South Street.

(2)  SR-284.  At Weber State University in Ogden.

(a)  From 4100 South Street northerly on the peripheral road to Edvalson Street; then northwesterly and westerly on 3700 South Street to Route 203, Harrison Boulevard.

(b)  From Route 203 easterly on 4100 South Street to Taylor Avenue.

(c)  Campus North Road from the north-south peripheral road easterly on Edvalson Street to Foothill Drive.

(d)  From Route 203, Harrison Boulevard, easterly on 3850 South Street to north-south peripheral road.

(e)  From Route 203, Harrison Boulevard, easterly on 4000 South Street to the north-south peripheral road.

(3)  SR-285.  The Institute for the Deaf.  From Twentieth Street in Ogden northwesterly to Monroe Avenue.

(4)  SR-286.  From Route 235 to and including a peripheral road at the State Industrial School in Ogden.

(5)  SR-287.  From Route 140 northerly to the Utah State Prison Vehicle Direction Station.

(6)  SR-289.  At College of Southern Utah.  From Route 130 in Cedar City westerly on Center Street to 1150 West Street; then south to Second South Street; then east to Third West Street; then north to Center Street, providing a peripheral road around the College of Southern Utah.

(7)  SR-290.  At Snow College.  From Route 89 in Ephraim easterly on First North Street to Fourth East Street; then south to Center Street; then west to Route 89, providing a peripheral road around Snow College.



Amended by Chapter 57, 2008 General Session

